Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,190
Other claims against dissolved corporation.

(MBCA 14.07) (a) A dissolved
corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons
with claims against the dissolved corporation present them in accordance with
the notice.

(b) The notice must:

(1) Be published one time
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation's
principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or
was last located;

(2)
Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing
address where the claim may be sent; and

(3) State that a claim against the dissolved corporation
will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within
three years after the publication of the notice.

(c) If the dissolved corporation publishes
a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the
claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences
a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within
three years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

(1) A claimant who was not
given written notice under section 21-2,189;

(2) A claimant whose claim was timely
sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; or

(3) A claimant whose claim
is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(d) A claim that is not barred
by subsection (b) of section 21-2,189 or subsection (c) of this section may
be enforced:

(1)
Against the dissolved corporation to the extent of its undistributed assets;
or

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (d) of section 21-2,191, if the assets have
been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation
to the extent of the shareholder's pro rata share of the claim or the corporate
assets distributed to the shareholder in liquidation, whichever is less, but
a shareholder's total liability for all claims under this section may not
exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 190.